Maryland, session 2025, SB0159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–316 through 7–319 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–317 through 7–320, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–316.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0159*

SENATE BILL 159
THE AMERICAN PERSIMMON IS THE STATE FRUIT.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.